Ohio, session 136, HB350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 2923.13 and 2923.14 be amended 8
and section 2923.133 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as 9
follows: 10
Sec. 2923.13. (A) Unless relieved from disability under 11
operation of law or legal process, no person shall knowingly 12
acquire, have, carry, or use any firearm or dangerous ordnance, 13
if any of the following apply: 14
(1) The person is a fugitive from justice. 15
(2) The person is under indictment for or has been 16
convicted of any felony offense of violence or has been 17

H. B. No. 350 Page 2
As Introduced
adjudicated a delinquent child for the commission of an offense 18
that, if committed by an adult, would have been a felony offense 19
of violence. 20
(3) The person is under indictment for or has been 21
convicted of any felony offense involving the illegal 22
possession, use, sale, administration, distribution, or 23
trafficking in any drug of abuse or has been adjudicated a 24
delinquent child for the commission of an offense that, if 25
committed by an adult, would have been a felony offense 26
involving the illegal possession, use, sale, administration, 27
distribution, or trafficking in any drug of abuse. 28
(4) The person has a drug dependency, is in danger of drug 29
dependence, or has chronic alcoholism. 30
(5) The person is under adjudication of mental 31
incompetence, has been committed to a mental institution, has 32
been found by a court to be a person with a mental illness 33
subject to court order, or is an involuntary patient other than 34
one who is a patient only for purposes of observation. As used 35
in this division, "person with a mental illness subject to court 36
order" and "patient" have the same meanings as in section 37
5122.01 of the Revised Code. 38
(6) The person has been convicted of a violation of 39
section 2923.133 of the Revised Code or has been adjudicated a 40
delinquent child for the commission of a violation of that 41
section. 42
(B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of having 43
weapons while under disability, a felony of the third degree. 44
(C) For the purposes of this section, "under operation of 45
law or legal process" shall not itself include mere completion, 46

H. B. No. 350 Page 3
As Introduced
termination, or expiration of a sentence imposed as a result of 47
a criminal conviction. 48
Sec. 2923.133. (A) On and after the date that is one 49
hundred eighty days after the effective date of this section, no 50
person shall import, manufacture, sell, transfer, or possess a 51
trigger crank, a bump-fire device, or any part, combination of 52
parts, component, device, attachment, or accessory that is 53
designed or functions to accelerate the rate of fire of a semi- 54
automatic firearm but not convert the semi-automatic firearm 55
into an automatic firearm. 56
(B) This section does not apply with respect to the 57
importation for, manufacture for, sale to, transfer to, or 58
possession of any item specified in division (A) of this section 59
by or under authority of the United States or any department or 60
agency of the United States or by this state, any other state, 61
or a department, agency, or political subdivision of this state 62
or any other state. 63
(C) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is 64
guilty of "illegal rate-of-fire acceleration conduct," a felony 65
of the fourth degree. 66
Sec. 2923.14. (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in 67
division (A)(2) of this section, any person who is prohibited 68
from acquiring, having, carrying, or using firearms may apply to 69
the court of common pleas in the county in which the person 70
resides for relief from such prohibition. 71
(2) Division (A)(1) of this section does not apply to a 72
person who has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a 73
violation of section 2923.132 of the Revised Code or to a person 74
who, two or more times, has been convicted of or pleaded guilty 75

H. B. No. 350 Page 4
As Introduced
to a felony and a specification of the type described in section 76
2941.141, 2941.144, 2941.145, 2941.146, 2941.1412, or 2941.1424 77
of the Revised Code. 78
(B) The application shall recite the following: 79
(1) All indictments, convictions, or adjudications upon 80
which the applicant's disability is based, the sentence imposed 81
and served, and any release granted under a community control 82
sanction, post-release control sanction, or parole, any partial 83
or conditional pardon granted, or other disposition of each 84
case, or, if the disability is based upon a factor other than an 85
indictment, a conviction, or an adjudication, the factor upon 86
which the disability is based and all details related to that 87
factor; 88
(2) Facts showing the applicant to be a fit subject for 89
relief under this section. 90
(C) A copy of the application shall be served on the 91
county prosecutor. The county prosecutor shall cause the matter 92
to be investigated and shall raise before the court any 93
objections to granting relief that the investigation reveals. 94
(D) Upon hearing, the court may grant the applicant relief 95
pursuant to this section, if all of the following apply: 96
(1) One of the following applies: 97
(a) If the disability is based upon an indictment, a 98
conviction, or an adjudication, the applicant has been fully 99
discharged from imprisonment, community control, post-release 100
control, and parole, or, if the applicant is under indictment, 101
has been released on bail or recognizance. 102
(b) If the disability is based upon a factor other than an 103

H. B. No. 350 Page 5
As Introduced
indictment, a conviction, or an adjudication, that factor no 104
longer is applicable to the applicant. 105
(2) The applicant has led a law-abiding life since 106
discharge or release, and appears likely to continue to do so. 107
(3) The applicant is not otherwise prohibited by law from 108
acquiring, having, or using firearms. 109
(E) Costs of the proceeding shall be charged as in other 110
civil cases, and taxed to the applicant. 111
(F) Relief from disability granted pursuant to this 112
section restores the applicant to all civil firearm rights to 113
the full extent enjoyed by any citizen, and is subject to the 114
following conditions: 115
(1) Applies only with respect to indictments, convictions, 116
or adjudications, or to the other factor, recited in the 117
application as the basis for the applicant's disability; 118
(2) Applies only with respect to firearms lawfully 119
acquired, possessed, carried, or used by the applicant; 120
(3) May be revoked by the court at any time for good cause 121
shown and upon notice to the applicant; 122
(4) Is automatically void upon commission by the applicant 123
of any offense set forth in division (A)(2) or, (3), or (6) of 124
section 2923.13 of the Revised Code, or upon the applicant's 125
becoming one of the class of persons named in division (A)(1), 126
(4), or (5) of that section. 127
(G) As used in this section: 128
(1) "Community control sanction" has the same meaning as 129
in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. 130

H. B. No. 350 Page 6
As Introduced
(2) "Post-release control" and "post-release control 131
sanction" have the same meanings as in section 2967.01 of the 132
Revised Code. 133
Section 2. That existing sections 2923.13 and 2923.14 of 134
the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 135